Washington statutes.
RCW 16.68.150

Feeding of carcasses to swine unlawful—Exception.

It shall be unlawful to feed carcasses of animals, or any part or portion thereof, to swine, unless said carcasses or portions thereof are cooked in a manner prescribed by the director.

[ 1949 c 100 s 16; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3142-20.]

NOTES:

Swine, garbage feeding: RCW 16.36.105 and 16.36.110.